Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2131
Certified social workers; certified master social workers; act, how construed.

Nothing in the Mental Health Practice Act shall be construed to require the State of Nebraska, any agency of the State of Nebraska, or any of the entities which operate under rules and regulations of a state agency, which either employ or contract for the services of social services workers, to employ or contract with only persons certified pursuant to the act for the performance of any of the professional activities enumerated in section 38-2119.

Laws 1986, LB 286, § 21;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 71-1,264;

Laws 1993, LB 669, § 42;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,323;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 748.